Hawaii, session 2025, SB1486.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  This Act is recommended by the governor for immediate passage in accordance with section 9 of article VII of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii. SECTION 2. Act 117, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, transferred the enforcement of the motor carrier law from the public utilities commission to the department of transportation without appropriations to fund positions and administrative costs.  The purpose of this Act is to make an emergency appropriation to provide funds for the department of transportation to cover payroll, fringe benefits, and administration costs for the enforcement of the motor carrier law. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the state highway fund the sum of $1,500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2024-2025 for payroll, fringe benefits, and administrative costs for the enforcement of the motor carrier law transferred by Act 117, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of transportation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. Any provision of this Act to the contrary notwithstanding, the appropriation authorized under this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made.  Any unexpended and unencumbered balance of the appropriation made in this Act as of the close of business on June 30, 2026, shall lapse back to the state highway fund. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST